California statutes. Insurance Code
(v) The noninsurers within the insurance holding company system do not pose a material financial risk to the insurer’s ability to honor policyholder obligations.

(B) If an insurance holding company system has previously filed the annual group capital calculation at least once, the lead state commissioner may accept a limited group capital filing in lieu of the group capital calculation if all of the following criteria are met:

(i) The insurance holding company system has annual direct written and unaffiliated assumed premium, including international direct and assumed premium, but excluding premiums reinsured with the Federal Crop Insurance Corporation and Federal Flood Program, of less than one billion dollars
 ($1,000,000,000).

(ii) The insurance holding company system does not have insurers within its holding company structure that are domiciled outside of the United States or one of its territories.

(iii) The insurance holding company system does not include within its structure a banking, depository, or other financial entity that is subject to an identified regulatory capital framework.

(iv) The insurance holding company system attests to both of the following:

(I) That there are no material changes in the transactions between insurers and noninsurers in the group that have occurred since the last filing of the annual group capital calculation.

(II) That the noninsurers within the insurance holding company system do not pose a material financial risk to the insurer’s ability to honor policyholder obligations.

(C) If an insurance holding company has previously met an exemption pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B), the lead state
 commissioner may require at any time the ultimate controlling person to file an annual group capital calculation, completed in accordance with the NAIC Group Capital Calculation Instructions, if an insurer within the insurance holding company system meets any of the following criteria:

(i) An insurer is in a risk-based capital action level event as set forth in Article 4.1 (commencing with Section 739) of Chapter 1 or meets a similar standard for a non-United States insurer.

(ii) An insurer meets one or more of the standards of an insurer deemed to be in hazardous financial condition as defined in Section 2598.2 of Title 10 of the California Code of Regulations.

(iii) An insurer otherwise exhibits qualities of a
 troubled insurer, as determined by the lead state commissioner based on unique circumstances including the type and volume of business written, ownership and organizational structure, federal agency requests, and international supervisor requests.

(D) If the lead state commissioner determines that an insurance holding company system no longer meets one or more of the requirements for an exemption from filing the group capital calculation under this paragraph, the insurance holding company system shall file the group capital calculation at the next annual filing date, unless the lead state commissioner authorizes an extension based on reasonable grounds shown.

(p) The ultimate controlling person of an insurer subject to registration and also scoped into the NAIC Liquidity Stress
 Test Framework shall file the results of a specific year’s liquidity stress test. The filing shall be made to the lead state commissioner of the insurance holding company system as determined by the procedures
 within the Financial Analysis Handbook adopted by the NAIC.

(1) The NAIC Liquidity Stress Test Framework includes scope criteria applicable to a specific data year. These scope criteria are reviewed at least annually by the NAIC Financial Stability Task Force or its successor. Any change to the NAIC Liquidity Stress Test Framework or to the data year for which the scope criteria are to be measured shall be effective on January 1 of the year following the calendar year when those changes are adopted. Insurers meeting at least one threshold of the scope criteria are considered scoped into the NAIC Liquidity Stress Test Framework for the specified data year unless the lead state commissioner, in consultation with the NAIC Financial Stability Task Force or its successor, determines the insurer should not be scoped into the framework
 for that data year. Similarly, insurers that do not trigger at least one threshold of the scope criteria are considered scoped out of the NAIC Liquidity Stress Test Framework for the specified data year, unless the lead state commissioner, in consultation with the NAIC Financial Stability Task Force or its successor, determines the insurer should be scoped into the NAIC Liquidity Stress Test Framework for that data year.

(2) Because regulators wish to avoid having insurers scoped in and out of the NAIC Liquidity Stress Test Framework on a frequent basis, the lead state commissioner, in consultation with the NAIC Financial Stability Task Force or its successor, shall assess this concern as part of the determination pursuant to paragraph (1).

(3) The performance of, and filing of the
 results from, a specific year’s liquidity stress test shall comply with the NAIC Liquidity Stress Test Framework’s instructions and reporting templates for that year and any lead state commissioner determinations, in conjunction with the NAIC Financial Stability Task Force or its successor, provided within the framework.

(q) For purposes of subdivisions (n), (o), and (p), “lead state commissioner” means the Insurance Commissioner, as long as, and only if, California is considered the lead state in accordance with the procedures within the Financial Analysis Handbook adopted by the NAIC.

(r) The failure to file a registration statement, summary thereof, amendment to the statement, or report of dividend required by this section within the time specified for the filing is a
 violation of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 116.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1215.5.

(a) Transactions by registered insurers with their affiliates are subject to the following standards:

(1) The terms shall be fair and reasonable and consistent with the current version of Section 19 of the NAIC Insurance Holding Company System Model Regulation, subject to the requirements of this article.

(2) Charges or fees for services performed shall be reasonable.

(3) Expenses incurred and payment received shall be allocated to the insurer in conformity with customary insurance accounting practices consistently applied.

(4) The books, accounts, and records of each party
 to all transactions shall be so maintained as to clearly and accurately disclose the precise nature and details of the transactions, including accounting information that is necessary to support the reasonableness of the charges or fees to the parties.

(5) The insurer’s policyholder’s surplus following any dividends or distributions to shareholder affiliates shall be reasonable in relation to the insurer’s outstanding liabilities and adequate to its financial needs.

(b) The following transactions involving a domestic insurer or commercially domiciled insurer, as defined in Section 1215.14, and any person in its insurance holding company system, including amendments or modifications of affiliate agreements previously filed pursuant to this section, may be entered into only if the insurer has notified the commissioner in writing of its intention to enter into the transaction at
 least 30 days prior thereto, or a shorter period as the commissioner may permit, and the commissioner has not disapproved it within that period. The notice for amendments or modifications shall include the reasons for the change and the financial impact on the domestic insurer or commercially domiciled insurer. Informal notice shall be reported, within 30 days after a termination of a previously filed agreement, to the commissioner for determination of the type of filing required, if any. The commissioner shall require the payment of two thousand eight hundred twenty-three dollars ($2,823) as a fee for filings pursuant to this subdivision, and the filings shall be on a form and in a format prescribed by the NAIC. The payment shall accompany the filing.

(1) Sales, purchases, exchanges, loans, extensions of credit, or investments, if the transactions are equal to or exceed:

(A) For
 a nonlife insurer, the lesser of 3 percent of the insurer’s admitted assets or 25 percent of the policyholder’s surplus as of the preceding December 31.

(B) For a life insurer, 3 percent of the insurer’s admitted assets as of the preceding December 31.

(2) Loans or extensions of credit to a person who is not an affiliate, if made with the agreement or understanding that the proceeds of the transactions, in whole or in substantial part, are to be used to make loans or extensions of credit to, to purchase assets of, or to make investments in, any affiliate of the insurer, if the transactions are equal to or exceed:

(A) For a nonlife insurer, the lesser of 3 percent of the insurer’s admitted assets or 25 percent of the policyholder’s surplus as of the preceding December 31.

(B) For a life insurer, 3 percent of the insurer’s admitted assets as of the preceding December 31.

(3) Reinsurance agreements and pooling agreements and modifications thereto in which the reinsurance premium or a change in the insurer’s liabilities, or the projected reinsurance premium or a change in the insurer’s liabilities in any of the next three years, equals or exceeds 5 percent of the insurer’s policyholder’s surplus, as of the preceding December 31, including those agreements that may require as consideration the transfer of assets from an insurer to a nonaffiliate, if an agreement or understanding exists between the insurer and nonaffiliate that any portion of the assets will be transferred to one or more affiliates of the insurer.

(4) All management agreements, service contracts, tax sharing agreements, and
 cost-sharing arrangements. However, subscription agreements or powers of attorney executed by subscribers of a reciprocal or interinsurance exchange are not required to be reported pursuant to this section if the form of the agreement was in use before 1943 and was not amended in any way to modify payments, fees, or waivers of fees or otherwise substantially amended after 1943. Payment or waiver of fees or other amounts due under subscription agreements or powers of attorney forms that were in use before 1943 and that have not been amended in any way to modify payments, fees, or waiver of fees, or otherwise substantially amended after 1943 shall not be subject to regulation pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(5) Guarantees when initiated or made by a domestic or commercially domiciled insurer, provided that a guarantee that is quantifiable as to amount is not subject to the notice requirements of this paragraph unless it exceeds the
 lesser of one-half of 1 percent of the insurer’s admitted assets or 10 percent of surplus as regards policyholders as of the 31st day of December next preceding. Further, all guarantees that are not quantifiable as to amount are subject to the notice requirements of this paragraph.

(6) Derivative transactions or series of derivative transactions. The written filing to the commissioner shall include the type or types of derivative transactions, the affiliate or affiliates engaging with the insurer in the derivative transactions, the objective and the rationale for the derivative transaction or series of derivative transactions, the maximum maturity and economic effect of the derivative transactions, and any other information required by the commissioner. Derivative transactions entered into pursuant to this subdivision shall comply with the provisions of Section 1211.

(7) Direct or
 indirect acquisitions or investments in a person that controls the insurer or in an affiliate of the insurer in an amount that, together with its present holdings in those investments, exceeds 2.5 percent of the insurer’s policyholder’s surplus. Direct or indirect acquisitions or investments in subsidiaries acquired under Section 1215.1, or in nonsubsidiary insurance affiliates that are subject to the provisions of this article, or in subsidiaries acquired pursuant to Section 1199, are exempt from this requirement.

(8) Any material transactions, specified by regulation, that the commissioner determines may adversely affect the interests of the insurer’s policyholders.

(c) A domestic insurer may not enter into transactions that are part of a plan or series of transactions with persons within the holding company system if the purpose of those transactions is to avoid the statutory
 threshold amount and thus avoid review. If the commissioner determines that separate transactions were entered into over any 12-month period to avoid review, the commissioner may exercise his or her authority under Section 1215.11.

(d) The commissioner, in reviewing transactions under subdivision (b), shall consider whether the transactions comply with the standards set forth in subdivision (a) and whether they may adversely affect the interests of policyholders.

(e) The commissioner shall be notified within 30 days of any investment by the insurer in any one corporation if the total investment in the corporation by the insurance holding company system exceeds 10 percent of the corporation’s voting securities.

(f) For purposes of this article, in determining whether an insurer’s policyholder’s surplus is reasonable
 in relation to the insurer’s outstanding liabilities and adequate to its financial needs, the following factors, among others, shall be considered:

(1) The size of the insurer, as measured by its assets, capital and surplus, reserves, premium writings, insurance in force, and other appropriate criteria.

(2) The extent to which the insurer’s business is diversified among the several lines of insurance.

(3) The number and size of risks insured in each line of business.

(4) The extent of the geographical dispersion of the insurer’s insured risks.

(5) The nature and extent of the insurer’s reinsurance program.

(6) The quality,
 diversification, and liquidity of the insurer’s investment portfolio.

(7) The recent past and projected future trend in the size of the insurer’s investment portfolio.

(8) The recent past and projected future trend in the size of the insurer’s surplus, and the policyholder’s surplus maintained by other comparable insurers.

(9) The adequacy of the insurer’s reserves.

(10) The quality and liquidity of investments in subsidiaries made under Section 1215.1. The commissioner may treat those investments as a disallowed asset for purposes of determining the adequacy of the policyholder’s surplus whenever, in his or her judgment, the investment so warrants.

(11) The quality of the company’s
 earnings and the extent to which the reported earnings include extraordinary accounting items.

(g) An insurer, subject to registration under Section 1215.4, shall not pay any extraordinary dividend or make any other extraordinary distribution to its stockholders until 30 days after the commissioner has received notice of the declaration thereof and has approved the payment or has not, within the 30-day period, disapproved the payment.

For purposes of this section, an extraordinary dividend or distribution is any dividend or distribution that, together with other dividends or distributions made within the preceding 12 months, exceeds the greater of (1) 10 percent of the insurer’s policyholder’s surplus as of the preceding December 31, or (2) the net gain from operations of the insurer, if the insurer is a life insurer, or the net income, if the insurer is not a life insurer, for the 12-month period
 ending the preceding December 31.

Notwithstanding any other law, an insurer may declare an extraordinary dividend or distribution that is conditional upon the commissioner’s approval. The declaration confers no rights upon stockholders until the commissioner has approved the payment of the dividend or distribution or until the commissioner has not disapproved the payment within the 30-day period referred to in this subdivision.

(h) Notwithstanding the control of a domestic insurer by any person, the officers and directors of the insurer shall not thereby be relieved of any obligation or liability to which they would otherwise be subject to by law, and the insurer shall be managed to ensure its separate operating identity consistent with the provisions of this article. However, nothing in this article shall preclude a domestic insurer from having or sharing a common management or cooperative or joint
 use of personnel, property, or services with one or more other persons under arrangements meeting the standards of subdivision (a).

(i) The provisions of this section do not apply to any insurer, information, or transaction exempted by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 29.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1215.6.

(a) Subject to the limitation contained in this section, and in addition to the powers which the commissioner has under Article 4 (commencing with Section 730) of Chapter 1 of this part relating to the examination of insurers, the commissioner shall also have the power to examine any insurer registered under Section 1215.4 and its affiliates to ascertain the enterprise risk to which the insurer is subjected by the ultimate controlling party, or by any entity or combination of entities within the insurance holding company system, or by the insurance holding company system on a consolidated basis. The commissioner may also order any insurer registered under Section 1215.4 to produce the records, books, or other information or papers in the possession of the insurer or its affiliates,
 including a report on the enterprise risk to the insurer by the ultimate controlling party, or by any entity or combination of entities within the insurance holding company system, or by the insurance holding company system on a consolidated basis, as shall be necessary to ascertain the financial condition or legality of conduct of that insurer.

(b) The commissioner shall exercise his or her power under subdivision (a) only if the examination of the insurer under Article 4 (commencing with Section 730) of Chapter 1 of this part is inadequate or the interests of the policyholders of that insurer are being adversely affected.

(c) The commissioner may retain at the registered insurer’s expense the attorneys, actuaries, accountants, and other experts not otherwise a part of the commissioner’s staff as shall be reasonably necessary to assist in the conduct of the examination under
 subdivision (a) of this section. Any persons so retained shall be under the direction and control of the commissioner and shall act in a purely advisory capacity.

(d) Each registered insurer producing for examination records, books, and papers pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be liable for, and shall pay the expense of, that examination in accordance with Section 736.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 213, Sec. 6.   (AB 553)   Effective August 17, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1215.7.

(a) With respect to any insurer registered under Section 1215.4, and in accordance with subdivision (c), the commissioner shall also have the power to participate in a supervisory college for any domestic insurer that is part of an insurance holding company system with international operations in order to determine compliance by the insurer with this article. The powers of the commissioner with respect to supervisory colleges include, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) Initiating the establishment of a supervisory college.

(2) Clarifying the membership and participation of other supervisors in the
 supervisory college.

(3) Clarifying the functions of the supervisory college and the role of other regulators, including the establishment of a groupwide supervisor.

(4) Coordinating the ongoing activities of the supervisory college, including planning meetings, supervisory activities, and processes for information sharing.

(5) Establishing a crisis management plan.

(b) In order to assess the business strategy, financial position, legal and regulatory position, risk exposure, risk management, and governance processes, and as part of the examination of individual insurers in accordance with Section 1215.6, the commissioner may participate in a supervisory
 college with other regulators charged with supervision of the insurer or its affiliates, including other state, federal, and international regulatory agencies. A supervisory college may be convened as either a temporary or permanent forum for communication and cooperation between the regulators charged with the supervision of the insurer or its affiliates. The
 commissioner may enter into agreements in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 1215.8 providing the basis for cooperation between the commissioner and the other regulatory agencies, and the activities of the supervisory college. Nothing in this section shall delegate to the supervisory college the authority of the commissioner to regulate or supervise the insurer or its affiliates within its jurisdiction.

(c) An insurer registered under Section 1215.4 that is subject to this section shall be liable for and shall, in accordance with Section 736, pay the reasonable expenses of the commissioner’s participation in a supervisory college pursuant to this section, including reasonable travel expenses, limited to those expenses
 reasonably related to the regulation of the insurer’s business in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 282, Sec. 7.   (SB 1448)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1215.75.

(a) (1) The commissioner is authorized to act as the groupwide supervisor for any internationally active insurance group in accordance with this section. However, the commissioner may otherwise acknowledge another regulatory official as the groupwide supervisor when the internationally active insurance group meets any of the following conditions:

(A) Does not have substantial insurance operations in the United States.

(B) Has substantial insurance operations in the United States, but not in this state.

(C) Has substantial insurance operations in the
 United States and this state, but the commissioner has determined pursuant to the factors set forth in subdivisions (b) and (f) that the other regulatory official is the appropriate groupwide supervisor.

(2) An insurance holding company system that does not otherwise qualify as an internationally active insurance group may request that the commissioner make a determination or acknowledgment as to a groupwide supervisor pursuant to this section.

(b) In cooperation with other state, federal, and international regulatory agencies, the commissioner shall identify a single groupwide supervisor for an internationally active insurance group. The commissioner may determine that he or she is the appropriate groupwide supervisor for an internationally active insurance group that conducts substantial insurance operations concentrated in the state. However, the commissioner may acknowledge
 that a regulatory official from another jurisdiction is the appropriate groupwide supervisor for the internationally active insurance group. The commissioner shall consider all of the following factors when making a determination or acknowledgment pursuant to this subdivision:

(1) The place of domicile of the insurers within the internationally active insurance group that hold the largest share of the group’s written premiums, assets, or liabilities.

(2) The place of domicile of the top-tiered insurer or insurers in the insurance holding company system of the internationally active insurance group.

(3) The location of the executive offices or largest operational offices of the internationally active insurance group.

(4) Whether another regulatory
 official is acting, or is seeking to act, as the groupwide supervisor under a regulatory system that the commissioner determines to be either of the following:

(A) Substantially similar to the system of regulation provided under the laws of this state.

(B) Otherwise sufficient in terms of providing for groupwide supervision, enterprise risk analysis, and cooperation with other regulatory officials.

(5) Whether another regulatory official acting, or seeking to act, as the groupwide supervisor provides the commissioner with reasonably reciprocal recognition and cooperation.

However, a commissioner identified pursuant to this section as the groupwide supervisor may determine that it is appropriate to acknowledge another supervisor to serve as the groupwide supervisor. The
 acknowledgment of the groupwide supervisor shall be made after consideration of the factors listed in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, and shall be made in cooperation with and subject to the acknowledgment of other regulatory officials involved with supervision of members of the internationally active insurance group, and in consultation with the internationally active insurance group.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, when another regulatory official is acting as the groupwide supervisor of an internationally active insurance group, the commissioner shall acknowledge that regulatory official as the groupwide supervisor. However, if there is a material change in the internationally active insurance group that results in either (1) the internationally active insurance group’s insurers domiciled in this state holding the largest share of the group’s premiums, assets, or liabilities, or (2) this state being the place of domicile of the
 top-tiered insurer or insurers in the insurance holding company system of the internationally active insurance group, the commissioner shall make a determination or acknowledgment as to the appropriate groupwide supervisor for that internationally active insurance group pursuant to subdivision (b).

(d) Pursuant to Section 1215.6, the commissioner is authorized to collect from any insurer registered pursuant to Section 1215.4 all information necessary to determine whether the commissioner may act as the groupwide supervisor of an internationally active insurance group or if the commissioner may acknowledge another regulatory official to act as the groupwide supervisor. Prior to issuing a determination that an internationally active insurance group is subject to groupwide supervision by the commissioner, the commissioner shall notify the insurer registered pursuant to Section 1215.4 and the ultimate controlling person within the internationally
 active insurance group. The internationally active insurance group shall have not less than 30 days to provide the commissioner with additional information pertinent to the pending determination. The commissioner shall publish on the department’s Internet Web site the identity of internationally active insurance groups that the commissioner has determined are subject to groupwide supervision by the commissioner.

(e) If the commissioner is the groupwide supervisor for an internationally active insurance group, the commissioner is authorized to engage in any of the following groupwide supervision activities:

(1) Assess the enterprise risks within the internationally active insurance group to ensure both of the following:

(A) The material financial condition and liquidity risks to the members of the internationally
 active insurance group that are engaged in the business of insurance are identified by management.

(B) Reasonable and effective mitigation measures are in place.

(2) Request, from any member of an internationally active insurance group subject to the commissioner’s supervision, information necessary and appropriate to assess enterprise risk, including, but not limited to, information about the members of the internationally active insurance group regarding any of the following:

(A) Governance, risk assessment, and management.

(B) Capital adequacy.

(C) Material intercompany transactions.

(3) Coordinate and, through the
 authority of the regulatory officials of the jurisdictions where members of the internationally active insurance group are domiciled, compel development and implementation of reasonable measures designed to ensure that the internationally active insurance group is able to timely recognize and mitigate enterprise risks to members of that internationally active insurance group that are engaged in the business of insurance.

(4) Communicate with other state, federal, and international regulatory agencies for members within the internationally active insurance group and share relevant information subject to the confidentiality provisions of Section 1215.8, through supervisory colleges as set forth in Section 1215.7 or otherwise.

(5) Enter into agreements with, or obtain documentation from, any insurer registered pursuant to Section 1215.4, any member of the internationally active
 insurance group, and any other state, federal, and international regulatory agencies for members of the internationally active insurance group, providing the basis for or otherwise clarifying the commissioner’s role as groupwide supervisor, including provisions for resolving disputes with other regulatory officials. These agreements or documentation shall not serve as evidence in any proceeding that any insurer or person within an insurance holding company system not domiciled or incorporated in this state is doing business in this state or is otherwise subject to jurisdiction in this state.

(6) Other groupwide supervision activities, consistent with the authorities and purposes enumerated above, as considered necessary by the commissioner.

(f) If the commissioner acknowledges that another regulatory official from a jurisdiction that is not accredited by the NAIC is the groupwide
 supervisor, the commissioner is authorized to reasonably cooperate, through supervisory colleges or otherwise, with groupwide supervision undertaken by the groupwide supervisor if the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The commissioner’s cooperation is in compliance with the laws of this state.

(2) The regulatory official acknowledged as the groupwide supervisor also recognizes and cooperates with the commissioner’s activities as a groupwide supervisor for other internationally active insurance groups when applicable. When that recognition and cooperation is not reasonably reciprocal, the commissioner is authorized to refuse recognition and cooperation.

(g) The commissioner is authorized to enter into agreements with, or obtain documentation from, any insurer registered pursuant to Section 1215.4, any affiliate
 of the insurer, and other state, federal, or international regulatory agencies for members of the internationally active insurance groups, that provide the basis for, or otherwise clarify, a regulatory official’s role as groupwide supervisor.

(h) A registered insurer subject to this section shall be liable for and shall pay the reasonable expenses of the commissioner’s participation in the administration of this section, including the engagement of attorneys, actuaries, and any other professionals and all reasonable travel expenses.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 213, Sec. 7.   (AB 553)   Effective August 17, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1215.8.

(a) All information, documents, and copies thereof obtained by or disclosed to the commissioner or any other person in the course of an examination or investigation made pursuant to Section 1215.4, 1215.5, 1215.6, 1215.7, or 1215.75, and all information reported or provided pursuant to Section 1215.4, 1215.5, 1215.6, 1215.7, or 1215.75 are recognized as being proprietary and containing trade secrets, shall be kept confidential, are not subject to disclosure by the commissioner pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code), are not subject to subpoena, and are not subject to discovery from the commissioner or admissible into evidence in a private civil action if
 obtained from the commissioner. This information shall not be made public by the commissioner or any other person, except to insurance departments of other states, without the prior written consent of the insurance company to which it pertains, unless the commissioner, after giving the insurer and its affiliates who would be affected thereby notice and opportunity to be heard, determines that the interests of policyholders, shareholders, or the public will be served by the publication of the information, in which event the commissioner may publish all or any part of the information in a manner as the commissioner may deem appropriate.

(1) For purposes of the information reported and provided to the department pursuant to subdivisions (n) and (o) of Section 1215.4, the commissioner shall maintain the confidentiality of the group capital
 calculation, the group capital ratio produced within the calculation, and any group capital information received from an insurance holding company system supervised by the Federal Reserve Board or a United States groupwide supervisor.

(2) For purposes of the information reported and provided to the department pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 1215.4, the commissioner shall maintain the confidentiality of the liquidity stress test results, supporting disclosures, and any liquidity stress test information received from an insurance holding company system supervised by the Federal Reserve Board and non-United States groupwide supervisors.

(b) In order to assist in the performance of the commissioner’s duties, the commissioner:

(1) May, upon request, be required to share documents, materials, or other information, including the confidential and privileged documents, materials, or information subject to subdivision (a), including proprietary and trade secret documents and materials, with other state, federal, and international regulatory agencies, with the NAIC, with a third-party consultant designated by the commissioner, and with state, federal, and international law enforcement authorities, including members of any supervisory college described in Section 1215.7, provided that the recipient agrees in writing to maintain the confidentiality and privileged status of the documents, materials, or other information, and has verified in writing the legal authority to maintain confidentiality.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), may only share confidential and
 privileged documents, materials, or information reported pursuant to subdivision (m) of Section 1215.4 with commissioners of states having statutes or regulations substantially similar to subdivision (a) and who have agreed in writing not to disclose the information.

(3) May receive documents, materials, or information, including otherwise confidential and privileged documents, materials, or information, including proprietary and trade secret information, from the NAIC and its affiliates and subsidiaries and from regulatory and law enforcement officials of other foreign or domestic jurisdictions, and shall maintain as confidential or privileged any documents, materials, or information received with notice or the understanding that it is confidential or privileged under the laws of the jurisdiction that is the source of the documents,
 materials, or information.

(4) May enter into written agreements with the NAIC and a third-party consultant designated by the commissioner governing sharing and use of information provided pursuant to this subdivision consistent with this subdivision that shall do the following:

(A) Specify procedures and protocols regarding the confidentiality and security of information shared with the NAIC or a third-party consultant designated by the commissioner pursuant to this subdivision, including procedures and protocols for sharing by the NAIC with other state, federal, or international regulators. The agreement shall provide that the recipient agrees in writing to maintain the confidentiality and privileged status of the documents, materials, or other information and has verified in
 writing the legal authority to maintain its confidentiality.

(B) Specify that ownership of information shared with the NAIC or a third-party consultant designated by the commissioner pursuant to this subdivision remains with the commissioner and the NAIC’s or third-party consultant’s use of the information is subject to the direction of the commissioner.

(C) Prohibit the NAIC or a third-party consultant designated by the commissioner from storing the information shared pursuant to this article in a permanent database after the underlying analysis is completed, except for the documents, materials, or information reported pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 1215.4.

(D) Require prompt notice to be given to an insurer whose
 confidential information in the possession of the NAIC or a third-party consultant designated by the commissioner pursuant to this subdivision is subject to a request or subpoena to the NAIC or a third-party consultant designated by the commissioner for disclosure or production.

(E) Require the NAIC or a third-party consultant designated by the commissioner to consent to intervention by an insurer in any judicial or administrative action in which the NAIC or a third-party consultant designated by the commissioner may be required to disclose confidential information about the insurer shared with the NAIC or a third-party consultant designated by the commissioner pursuant to this subdivision.

(F) For an agreement with a third-party consultant designated by the
 commissioner, provide for notification of the identity of the consultant to applicable insurers reporting or submitting documents, materials, or information pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 1215.4.

(c) The sharing of information by the commissioner pursuant to subdivision (b) shall not constitute a delegation of regulatory authority or rulemaking, and the commissioner is solely responsible for the administration, execution, and enforcement of the provisions of this article.

(d) A waiver of any applicable privilege or claim of confidentiality in the documents, materials, or information shall not occur as a result of disclosure to the commissioner under this section or as a result of sharing as authorized in subdivision (b).

(e) Documents, materials, or other information filed in the possession or control of the NAIC or a third-party consultant designated by the commissioner pursuant to this subdivision shall be confidential by law and privileged, shall not be subject to subpoena, and shall not be subject to discovery or admissible in evidence in any private civil action.

(f) (1) The group capital calculation and resulting group capital ratio required pursuant to subdivision (n) of Section 1215.4 and the liquidity stress test, along with its results and supporting
 disclosures, required pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 1215.4 are regulatory tools for assessing group risks and capital adequacy and group liquidity risks, respectively, and are not intended as a means to rank insurers or insurance holding company systems generally.
